Massachusetts, session 194th, H2757.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words "assistant deputy superintendent", in line 304, the
following words:- “Teacher C, D, E, Education Specialist A/B, C, D, and Librarian A/B, C or
equivalent or successive titles who have been employed in such capacities or other Group 4 titles
for 10 years or more;”.
of 1